Utah statutes.
78B-1-125.   Jurors and witnesses -- Certifying excessive fees a felony.

Any clerk or judge of any court, county attorney, district attorney, or other officer who certifies false information as a fact, whereby any witness or juror shall be allowed a greater sum than otherwise entitled to under the provisions of this title, is guilty of a felony.

